Illinois, session 104th, HB2676.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Underserved Health Care Provider Workforce 5Act is amended by changing Sections 3.04, 3.07, 3.08, 3.09, 63.10, 4.03, and 10 and by adding Section 3.12 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 935/3.04)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1453.04)8    Sec. 3.04. "Designated Shortage Area" means an area 9designated as by the Director as a physician shortage area, a 10medically underserved area, or a health professional shortage 11area critical health manpower shortage area as defined by the 12United States Department of Health and Human Services , 13Education and Welfare, or as further defined by the Department 14to enable it to effectively fulfill the purpose stated in 15Section 2 of this Act. Such areas may include the following:16        (a) an urban or rural area which is a rational area for 17    the delivery of health services;18        (b) a population group;19        (c) a public or nonprofit private medical facility; or20        (d) a government-owned, privately owned, independent, 21    or provider-based Rural Health Clinic or hospital that 22    accepts Medicaid, Medicare, the State's Children's Health 23    Insurance Program, private insurance, and self-pay.   HB2676 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08112 LNS 18158 b1(Source: P.A. 102-888, eff. 5-17-22.) 2    (110 ILCS 935/3.07)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1453.07)3    Sec. 3.07. "Eligible medical student" means a person who 4meets all of the following qualifications:5        (a) he or she is an Illinois resident at the time of 6    application for a scholarship under the program 7    established by this Act;8        (b) he or she is studying medicine in a medical school 9    located in Illinois, or studying chiropractic medicine in 10    a chiropractic college or institution in Illinois, or 11    studying optometry in an optometry college or institution 12    located in Illinois;13        (c) he or she exhibits financial need as determined by 14    the Department; and15        (d) he or she agrees to practice full-time in a 16    Designated Shortage Area as a primary care physician, 17    general surgeon, emergency medicine physician, 18    obstetrician, optometrist, anesthesiologist, 19    ophthalmologist, or chiropractic physician one year for 20    each year he or she is a scholarship recipient.21(Source: P.A. 103-219, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    (110 ILCS 935/3.08)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1453.08)23    Sec. 3.08. "Medical facility" means a facility for the 24delivery of health services and includes a hospital, State   HB2676 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08112 LNS 18158 b1mental health institution, public health center, outpatient 2medical facility, rehabilitation facility, long term care 3facility, community mental health center, migrant health 4center, a community health center, rural health center, 5federally qualified health center, federally qualified health 6center look alike, optometric office, or a State correctional 7institution.8(Source: P.A. 80-478.) 9    (110 ILCS 935/3.09)10    Sec. 3.09. Eligible health care provider. "Eligible health 11care provider" means a primary care physician, general 12surgeon, emergency medicine physician, obstetrician, 13chiropractic physician, optometrist, ophthalmologist, 14anesthesiologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or 15physician assistant who accepts Medicaid, Medicare, the 16State's Children's Health Insurance Program, private 17insurance, and self-pay.18(Source: P.A. 102-888, eff. 5-17-22; 103-219, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-507, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 20    (110 ILCS 935/3.10)21    Sec. 3.10. Primary care physician. "Primary care 22physician" means a general internist, family medicine 23physician, obstetrician, gynecologist, ophthalmologist, or 24general pediatrician.  HB2676 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08112 LNS 18158 b1(Source: P.A. 101-118, eff. 7-22-19.) 2    (110 ILCS 935/3.12 new)3    Sec. 3.12. Optometrist. "Optometrist" means a Doctor of 4Optometry licensed under the Illinois Optometric Practice Act 5of 1987. 6    (110 ILCS 935/4.03)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1454.03)7    Sec. 4.03. To establish a program of medical student 8scholarships and to award scholarships to eligible medical 9students.10(Source: P.A. 80-478.) 11    (110 ILCS 935/10)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1460)12    Sec. 10. Scholarship and loan repayment recipients who 13fail to fulfill the obligation described in subsection (d) of 14Section 3.07 or Section 4.10 of this Act shall pay to the 15Department a sum equal to 3 times the amount of the annual 16scholarship or loan repayment grant for each year the 17recipient fails to fulfill such obligation. A scholarship or 18loan repayment recipient who fails to fulfill the obligation 19described in subsection (d) of Section 3.07 or Section 4.10 20shall have 30 days from the date on which that failure begins 21in which to enter into a contract with the Department that sets 22forth the manner in which that sum is required to be paid. If 23the contract is not entered into within that 30 day period or   HB2676 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08112 LNS 18158 b1if the contract is entered into but the required payments are 2not made in the amounts and at the times provided in the 3contract, the scholarship or loan payment recipient also shall 4be required to pay to the Department interest at the rate of 9% 5per annum on the amount of that sum remaining due and unpaid. 6The amounts paid to the Department under this Section shall be 7deposited into the fund where the payment originated Community 8Health Center Care Fund and shall be used by the Department to 9improve access to primary health care services as authorized 10by subsection (a) of Section 2310-200 of the Department of 11Public Health Powers and Duties Law (20 ILCS 2310/2310-200).12    The Department may transfer to the Illinois Finance 13Authority, into an account outside the State treasury, moneys 14in the Community Health Center Care Fund as needed, but not to 15exceed an amount established, by rule, by the Department to 16establish a reserve or credit enhancement escrow account to 17support a financing program or a loan or equipment leasing 18program to provide moneys to support the purposes of 19subsection (a) of Section 2310-200 of the Department of Public 20Health Powers and Duties Law (20 ILCS 2310/2310-200). The 21disposition of moneys at the conclusion of any financing 22program under this Section shall be determined by an 23interagency agreement.24(Source: P.A. 93-205, eff. 1-1-04.) 25    (110 ILCS 935/3.05 rep.)  HB2676 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08112 LNS 18158 b1    Section 10. The Underserved Health Care Provider Workforce 2Act is amended by repealing Section 3.05. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 41, 2026.